Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB497.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.515 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The spouse, regardless of age, and any child, stepchild, or orphan, under the age of
twenty-six (26), of a permanently and totally disabled member of the Kentucky
National Guard or Reserve Component injured while on state active duty, active
duty for training, or inactive duty training, or a permanently and totally disabled
war veteran, or a one hundred percent (100%) service-connected disabled veteran
regardless of wartime service, or prisoner of war or member of the Armed Services
declared missing in action shall not be required to pay any matriculation or tuition
fees upon his admission to any state-supported institution of higher education or to
any state-supported vocational training school for a period not in excess of forty-
five (45) months in order to obtain a diploma, nor in excess of the lesser number of
months required for a certificate of completion.
(2) To be entitled to benefits under this section the parent or stepparent of the child
claiming benefits if living must be rated permanently and totally disabled for
pension purposes or one hundred percent (100%) disabled for compensation
purposes by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Department of
Defense. If the veteran is deceased, the claim to benefits is to be based on the rating
held by the veteran at the time of death or if a prisoner of war or missing in action,
must have been declared as such by the Department of Defense. Members of the
Kentucky National Guard must be rated permanently and totally disabled as
provided in KRS Chapter 342. The parent's, stepparent's, or spouse's service and
rating must be evidenced by certification from the records of the Kentucky
Department of Military Affairs, United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or
the Department of Defense of the United States.
(3) The parent-child relationship must be shown by birth certificate, legal adoption
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
papers, marriage certificate, or other documentary evidence. A stepchild must be a
member of the veteran's household. The spousal relationship must be shown by a
marriage certificate or other documentary evidence.
(4) To entitle a spouse, child, stepchild, or orphan to benefit under this section the
disabled member of the National Guard or Reserve Component veteran living or
deceased must have served on state active duty, active duty for training, or inactive
duty training or active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States, and his
discharge must have been under honorable conditions. He must be a resident or, if
deceased, have been a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(5) No provision of this section shall serve to deny these benefits to an eligible spouse,
child, stepchild, or orphan, who enlists, or who fulfills a military obligation, in the
Armed Forces of the United States and is discharged under honorable conditions;
the period of time spent in the military service to be compensated by like time,
beyond the age of twenty-six (26) years if required, but not in excess of the period
of enrollment as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The marriage of an eligible child, stepchild, or orphan, shall not serve to deny full
entitlement to the benefits provided in this section.
(7) The student shall complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid to
determine the level of need and eligibility for state and federal financial aid
programs. The amount of tuition waived under this section shall not exceed the
cost of tuition and mandatory fees at the institution less any state or federal
grants received, which shall be credited first to the student's tuition and fees.
Section 2. KRS 164.2841 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person whose parent or any nonmarried widow or widower whose spouse
was a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon becoming a law
enforcement officer, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter and who was killed
while in active service or training for active service or who died as a result of
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
a service-connected disability shall not be required to pay any matriculation or
tuition fee upon admission to any state-supported university, community
college, or vocational training institution. The provisions of this subsection
shall apply to any firefighter or volunteer firefighter who is killed or dies
under the conditions covered in this subsection on July 1, 1989, or thereafter.
(b) In order to obtain the benefits conferred by paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, adoption
papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship shall be
shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence. The parent's
or spouse's service and the cause of death shall be evidenced by certification
from the records of the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the
appropriate city or county law enforcement agency which employed the
deceased, the administrative agency for the fire department or fire protection
district recognized for funding under KRS 95A.262, or the administrative
agency having jurisdiction over any paid firefighters of all counties and cities
of all classes.
(2) (a) Any person whose parent or any nonmarried widow or widower whose spouse
was an employee participating in a state-administered retirement system, and
not otherwise covered by subsection (1) of this section, and who died as a
result of a duty-related injury as described in KRS 61.621 shall not be
required to pay any matriculation or tuition fee upon admission to any state-
supported university, community college, or vocational training institution.
(b) In order to obtain the benefits conferred by paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, adoption
papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship shall be
shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence. The parent's
or spouse's service and the cause of death shall be evidenced by certification
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
from the records of the employing agency or the appropriate retirement
system.
(3) The student shall complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid to
determine the level of need and eligibility for state and federal financial aid
programs. The amount of tuition waived under this section shall not exceed the
cost of tuition and mandatory fees at the institution less any state or federal
grants received, which shall be credited first to the student's tuition and fees.[If
one so admitted to a state-supported university, community college, or vocational
training institution under the provisions of this section shall have obtained a cash
scholarship paid or payable to the institution, from whatever source, the amount of
the scholarship shall be applied to the credit of the applicant in the payment of
incidental expenses of his attendance at the institution, and any balance, if the terms
of the scholarship permit, shall be returned to the applicant.]
Section 3. KRS 164.2842 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The spouse, regardless of age, and any child of a permanently and totally
disabled law enforcement officer, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter injured
while in active service or in training for active service, who is over the age of
seventeen (17) and under the age of twenty-three (23) shall not be required to
pay any matriculation or tuition fee upon his admission to any state-supported
university, community college, or vocational training institution for a period
not in excess of thirty-six (36) months in order to obtain a diploma, nor in
excess of the lesser number of months required for a certificate of completion.
(b) For the spouse or child to be entitled to benefits under this section, the
disabled law enforcement officer, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter shall be
rated permanently and totally disabled for pension purposes or one hundred
percent (100%) disabled for compensation purposes by the Kentucky Justice
and Public Safety Cabinet, the appropriate city or county law enforcement
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
agency which employed the disabled, the administrative agency for the fire
department or fire protection district recognized for funding under KRS
95A.262, or the administrative agency having jurisdiction over any paid
firefighters of all counties and cities of all classes, or if deceased, the claim to
benefits is to be based on the rating held by the law enforcement officer,
firefighter, or volunteer firefighter at the time of death. The parent's or
spouse's service and rating shall be evidenced by certification from the
records of the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the appropriate
local law enforcement agency, the administrative agency for the fire
department or fire protection district recognized for funding under KRS
95A.262, or the administrative agency having jurisdiction over any paid
firefighters of all counties and cities of all classes.
(c) In the absence of certification of permanent and total disability by the
Kentucky Department of Workers' Claims, the Kentucky Justice and Public
Safety Cabinet, the appropriate local law enforcement agency, the
administrative agency for the fire department or fire protection district
recognized for funding under KRS 95A.262, or the administrative agency
having jurisdiction over any paid firefighters of all counties and cities of all
classes, medical evidence showing permanent and total disability or the
existence of permanent and total disability for a period of at least thirty (30)
days immediately prior to death may be accepted, if this evidence is signed by
a physician licensed to practice or an official of an accredited medical
hospital.
(d) The parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, legal
adoption papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship
shall be shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence.
(e) To entitle a spouse or child to benefits under this section the disabled law
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
enforcement officer, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter shall have been a
resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon becoming a law
enforcement officer, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter.
(2) (a) The spouse, regardless of age, and any child of a person who was an
employee participating in a state-administered retirement system and not
otherwise covered by subsection (1) of this section and who was disabled as a
result of a duty-related injury as described in KRS 61.621, who is over the age
of seventeen (17) and under the age of twenty-three (23) shall not be required
to pay any matriculation or tuition fee upon his admission to any state-
supported university, community college, or vocational training institution for
a period not in excess of thirty-six (36) months in order to obtain a diploma,
nor in excess of the lesser number of months required for a certificate of
completion.
(b) The parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, legal
adoption papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship
shall be shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence.
(3) The marriage of an eligible child shall not serve to deny full entitlement to the
benefits provided in this section.
(4) The student shall complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid to
determine the level of need and eligibility for state and federal financial aid
programs. The amount of tuition waived under this section shall not exceed the
cost of tuition and mandatory fees at the institution less any state or federal
grants received, which shall be credited first to the student's tuition and fees.
Section 4. KRS 164.507 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The nonremarried spouse, regardless of age, and any child, stepchild, or orphan,
under the age of twenty-six (26), of a deceased veteran shall not be required to pay
any matriculation or tuition fees upon admission to any state-supported university,
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
junior college, or vocational training institute for a period not in excess of forty-five
(45) months in order to obtain a diploma, nor in excess of the lesser number of
months required for a certificate of completion, if the deceased parent or spouse:
(a) 1. Served in the Armed Forces of the United States during a national
emergency, wars declared by Congress, or actions of the United
Nations; or
2. Died while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States
regardless of wartime service; or
3. Died as a result of a service-connected disability acquired while on
active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States regardless of
wartime service; and
(b) 1. Was a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky at the time of death;
or
2. Was married to a resident of Kentucky at the time of death; and
3. If discharged, was under honorable conditions.
(2) In order to obtain the benefits conferred by subsection (1) of this section, the
parent-child relationship must be shown by birth certificate, adoption papers,
marriage certificate, or other documentary evidence. A stepchild must have been a
member of the veteran's household at the time of the veteran's death. The spousal
relationship must be shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary
evidence. The parent's or spouse's service and the cause of death must be evidenced
by certification from the records of the Kentucky Department of Military Affairs,
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Records, or the Department of
Defense of the United States. In the event one so admitted to a state-supported
university, junior college, or vocational training institution under this section shall
have obtained a cash scholarship paid or payable to the institution, from whatever
source, the amount of the scholarship shall be applied to the credit of the applicant
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
in the payment of incidental expenses of attendance at the institution, and any
balance, if the terms of the scholarship permit, shall be returned to the applicant.
(3) The student shall complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid to
determine the level of need and eligibility for state and federal financial aid
programs. The amount of tuition waived under this section shall not exceed the
cost of tuition and mandatory fees at the institution less any state or federal
grants received, which shall be credited first to the student's tuition and fees.
Section 5. KRS 164.020 is amended to read as follows:
The Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky shall:
(1) Develop and implement the strategic agenda with the advice and counsel of the
Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education. The council shall provide for and
direct the planning process and subsequent strategic implementation plans based on
the strategic agenda as provided in KRS 164.0203;
(2) Revise the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan with the advice and
counsel of the committee as set forth in KRS 164.004;
(3) Develop a system of public accountability related to the strategic agenda by
evaluating the performance and effectiveness of the state's postsecondary system.
The council shall prepare a report in conjunction with the accountability reporting
described in KRS 164.095, which shall be submitted to the committee, the
Governor, and the General Assembly by December 1 annually. This report shall
include a description of contributions by postsecondary institutions to the quality of
elementary and secondary education in the Commonwealth;
(4) Review, revise, and approve the missions of the state's universities and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The Council on
Postsecondary Education shall have the final authority to determine the compliance
of postsecondary institutions with their academic, service, and research missions;
(5) Establish and ensure that all postsecondary institutions in Kentucky cooperatively
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
provide for an integrated system of postsecondary education. The council shall
guard against inappropriate and unnecessary conflict and duplication by promoting
transferability of credits and easy access of information among institutions;
(6) Engage in analyses and research to determine the overall needs of postsecondary
education and adult education in the Commonwealth;
(7) Develop plans that may be required by federal legislation. The council shall for all
purposes of federal legislation relating to planning be considered the "single state
agency" as that term may be used in federal legislation. When federal legislation
requires additional representation on any "single state agency," the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall establish advisory groups necessary to satisfy federal
legislative or regulatory guidelines;
(8) (a) Determine tuition and approve the minimum qualifications for admission to
the state postsecondary educational system. In defining residency, the council
shall classify a student as having Kentucky residency if the student met the
residency requirements at the beginning of his or her last year in high school
and enters a Kentucky postsecondary education institution within two (2)
years of high school graduation. In determining the tuition for non-Kentucky
residents, the council shall consider the fees required of Kentucky students by
institutions in adjoining states, the resident fees charged by other states, the
total actual per student cost of training in the institutions for which the fees
are being determined, and the ratios of Kentucky students to non-Kentucky
students comprising the enrollments of the respective institutions, and other
factors the council may in its sole discretion deem pertinent, except that the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System may assess a mandatory
student fee not to exceed eight dollars ($8) per credit hour to be used
exclusively for debt service on amounts not to exceed seventy-five percent
(75%) of the total projects cost of the Kentucky Community and Technical
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
College System agency bond projects included in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part
II, J., 11.
(b) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System mandatory fee
established in this subsection shall only be used for debt service on agency
bond projects.
(c) Any fee established as provided by this subsection shall cease to be assessed
upon the retirement of the project bonds for which it services debt.
(d) Prior to the issuance of any bonds, the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall certify in writing to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet that sufficient funds have been raised to meet the
local match equivalent to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total project cost;
(9) Devise, establish, and periodically review and revise policies to be used in making
recommendations to the Governor for consideration in developing
recommendations to the General Assembly for appropriations to the universities,
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and to support strategies
for persons to maintain necessary levels of literacy throughout their lifetimes. The
council has sole discretion, with advice of the Strategic Committee on
Postsecondary Education and the executive officers of the postsecondary education
system, to devise policies that provide for allocation of funds among the
universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(10) Lead and provide staff support for the biennial budget process as provided under
KRS Chapter 48, in cooperation with the committee;
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, review and approve all
capital construction projects covered by KRS 45.750(1)(f), including real
property acquisitions, and regardless of the source of funding for projects or
acquisitions. Approval of capital projects and real property acquisitions shall
be on a basis consistent with the strategic agenda and the mission of the
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
respective universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System.
(b) The organized groups that are establishing community college satellites as
branches of existing community colleges in the counties of Laurel, Leslie, and
Muhlenberg, and that have substantially obtained cash, pledges, real property,
or other commitments to build the satellite at no cost to the Commonwealth,
other than operating costs that shall be paid as part of the operating budget of
the main community college of which the satellite is a branch, are authorized
to begin construction of the satellite on or after January 1, 1998;
(12) Require reports from the executive officer of each institution it deems necessary for
the effectual performance of its duties;
(13) Ensure that the state postsecondary system does not unnecessarily duplicate
services and programs provided by private postsecondary institutions and shall
promote maximum cooperation between the state postsecondary system and private
postsecondary institutions. Receive and consider an annual report prepared by the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities stating the
condition of independent institutions, listing opportunities for more collaboration
between the state and independent institutions and other information as appropriate;
(14) Establish course credit, transfer, and degree components as required in KRS
164.2951;
(15) (a) Define and approve the offering of all postsecondary education technical,
associate, baccalaureate, graduate, and professional degree, certificate, or
diploma programs in the public postsecondary education institutions. The
council shall not approve a new degree, certificate, or diploma program that
includes a requirement for a course or training of which the primary purpose
is to indoctrinate participants with a discriminatory concept.
(b) The council shall expedite wherever possible the approval of requests from
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System board of regents
relating to new certificate, diploma, technical, or associate degree programs of
a vocational-technical and occupational nature. Without the consent of the
General Assembly, the council shall not abolish or limit the total enrollment
of the general program offered at any community college to meet the goal of
reasonable access throughout the Commonwealth to a two (2) year course of
general studies designed for transfer to a baccalaureate program. This does not
restrict or limit the authority of the council, as set forth in this section, to
eliminate or make changes in individual programs within that general
program;
(16) Eliminate, in its discretion, existing programs or make any changes in existing
academic programs at the state's postsecondary educational institutions, taking into
consideration these criteria:
(a) Consistency with the institution's mission and the strategic agenda;
(b) Alignment with the priorities in the strategic implementation plan for
achieving the strategic agenda;
(c) Elimination of unnecessary duplication of programs within and among
institutions;
(d) Efforts to create cooperative programs with other institutions through
traditional means, or by use of distance learning technology and electronic
resources, to achieve effective and efficient program delivery; and
(e) Alignment with KRS 164.2895, including the elimination of any program that
includes a requirement for a course or training of which the primary purpose
is to indoctrinate participants with a discriminatory concept;
(17) Ensure the governing board and faculty of all postsecondary education institutions
are committed to providing instruction free of discrimination against students who
hold political views and opinions contrary to those of the governing board and
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
faculty;
(18) Review proposals and make recommendations to the Governor regarding the
establishment of new public community colleges, technical institutions, and new
four (4) year colleges;
(19) Ensure the coordination, transferability, and connectivity of technology among
postsecondary institutions in the Commonwealth including the development and
implementation of a technology plan as a component of the strategic agenda;
(20) Approve the teacher education programs in the public institutions that comply with
standards established by the Education Professional Standards Board pursuant to
KRS 161.028;
(21) Constitute the representative agency of the Commonwealth in all matters of
postsecondary education of a general and statewide nature which are not otherwise
delegated to one (1) or more institutions of postsecondary learning. The
responsibility may be exercised through appropriate contractual relationships with
individuals or agencies located within or without the Commonwealth. The authority
includes but is not limited to contractual arrangements for programs of research,
specialized training, and cultural enrichment;
(22) Maintain procedures for the approval of a designated receiver to provide for the
maintenance of student records of the public institutions of higher education and the
colleges as defined in KRS 164.945, and institutions operating pursuant to KRS
165A.310 which offer collegiate level courses for academic credit, which cease to
operate. Procedures shall include assurances that, upon proper request, subject to
federal and state laws and regulations, copies of student records shall be made
available within a reasonable length of time for a minimum fee;
(23) Monitor and transmit a report on compliance with KRS 164.351 to the director of
the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint
Committee on Families and Children;
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
(24) (a) Develop in cooperation with each public university and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System a comprehensive orientation and
education program for new members of the council and the governing boards
and continuing education opportunities for all council and board members.
For new members of the council and institutional governing boards, the
council shall:
1. Ensure that the orientation and education program comprises six (6)
hours of instruction time and includes but is not limited to information
concerning the roles of the council and governing board members, the
strategic agenda and the strategic implementation plan, and the
respective institution's mission, budget and finances, strategic plans and
priorities, institutional policies and procedures, board fiduciary
responsibilities, legal considerations including open records and open
meetings requirements, ethical considerations arising from board
membership, and the board member removal and replacement
provisions of KRS 63.080;
2. Establish delivery methods by which the orientation and education
program can be completed in person or electronically by new members
within one (1) year of their appointment or election;
3. Provide an annual report to the Governor and Legislative Research
Commission of those new board members who do not complete the
required orientation and education program; and
4. Invite governing board members of private colleges and universities
licensed by the Council on Postsecondary Education to participate in the
orientation and education program described in this subsection;
(b) Offer, in cooperation with the public universities and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System, continuing education
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
opportunities for all council and governing board members; and
(c) Review and approve the orientation programs of each public university and
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for their governing
board members to ensure that all programs and information adhere to this
subsection;
(25) Develop a financial reporting procedure to be used by all state postsecondary
education institutions to ensure uniformity of financial information available to
state agencies and the public;
(26) Select and appoint a president of the council under KRS 164.013;
(27) Employ consultants and other persons and employees as may be required for the
council's operations, functions, and responsibilities;
(28) Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
governing its powers, duties, and responsibilities as described in this section;
(29) Prepare and present by January 31 of each year an annual status report on
postsecondary education in the Commonwealth to the Governor, the Strategic
Committee on Postsecondary Education, and the Legislative Research Commission;
(30) Consider the role, function, and capacity of independent institutions of
postsecondary education in developing policies to meet the immediate and future
needs of the state. When it is found that independent institutions can meet state
needs effectively, state resources may be used to contract with or otherwise assist
independent institutions in meeting these needs;
(31) Create advisory groups representing the presidents, faculty, nonteaching staff, and
students of the public postsecondary education system and the independent colleges
and universities;
(32) [Develop a statewide policy to promote employee and faculty development in state
and locally operated secondary area technology centers through the waiver of
tuition for college credit coursework in the public postsecondary education system.
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
Any regular full-time employee of a state or locally operated secondary area
technology center may, with prior administrative approval of the course offering
institution, take a maximum of six (6) credit hours per term at any public
postsecondary institution. The institution shall waive the tuition up to a maximum
of six (6) credit hours per term. The employee shall complete the Free Application
for Federal Student Aid to determine the level of need and eligibility for state and
federal financial aid programs. The amount of tuition waived shall not exceed the
cost of tuition at the institution less any state or federal grants received, which shall
be credited first to the student's tuition;
(33) ]Participate with the Kentucky Department of Education, the Kentucky Board of
Education, and postsecondary education institutions to ensure that academic content
requirements for successful entry into postsecondary education programs are
aligned with high school content standards and that students who master the high
school academic content standards shall not need remedial courses. The council
shall monitor the results on an ongoing basis;
(33)[(34)] Cooperate with the Kentucky Department of Education and the Education
Professional Standards Board in providing information sessions to selected
postsecondary education content faculty and teacher educators of the high school
academic content standards as required under KRS 158.6453(2)(l);
(34)[(35)] Cooperate with the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics and ensure the
participation of the public institutions as required in KRS 151B.133;
(35)[(36)] Pursuant to KRS 63.080, review written notices from the Governor or from a
board of trustees or board of regents concerning removal of a board member or the
entire appointed membership of a board, investigate the member or board and the
conduct alleged to support removal, and make written recommendations to the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission as to whether the member or
board should be removed; and
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1046
(36)[(37)] Exercise any other powers, duties, and responsibilities necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant the
Council on Postsecondary Education authority to disestablish or eliminate any
college of law which became a part of the state system of higher education through
merger with a state college.
Section 6. The following KRS section is repealed:
164.284 Waiver of tuition and fees for person sixty-five or older -- Conditions.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/23/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed